Hawaii statutes.
[§5-12.5] State mammal. The Hawaiian
monk seal (Monachus schauinslandi) is established and designated as the
official mammal of the State. [L 2008, c 72, §2]

Cross References

Taking a monk seal prohibited, see §195D-4.5.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next